Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 41 Theft, Embezzlement, False Pretenses, and Misappropriation

11-41-1.
Stealing as larceny.

Every person who shall steal any money, goods, or chattels, or any note of the general treasurer of this state for the payment of money, any bank bill, any certificate of any bank or of any public officer or corporation securing the payment of money to any person or certifying it to be due, any certificate of stock in any corporation, any order entitling a person to money or other article, or any bill of exchange, bill of lading, railroad ticket, bond, warrant, obligation, bill, or promissory note for the payment of money, or other valuable property, or any record or paper belonging to any public officer, or any writ, warrant, or other legal process, or any book or part of one containing an account, any receipt for money or other article paid or delivered, any adjustment or document of any kind relating to the payment of money or delivery of any article, any indenture of apprenticeship, or any deed, covenant, indenture, or assurance whatsoever respecting any property, real or personal, shall be deemed guilty of larceny.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 11; C.P.A. 1905, § 1172; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 11; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-1

.

11-41-2.
Receiving stolen goods.

Every person who shall fraudulently receive any stolen money, goods, securities, chattels, or other property, knowing it to be stolen, shall be deemed guilty of larceny, although the person who stole the property may not have been prosecuted or convicted for it. The possession of any stolen property shall be evidence of guilty knowledge by the person having possession that the property was stolen, unless the person shows that it was acquired in the due course of trade and for adequate consideration.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1173; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 13; P.L. 1928, ch. 1208, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-2

.

11-41-3.
Embezzlement and fraudulent conversion.

Every official of a financial institution and every officer, agent, clerk, servant, or other person to whom any money or other property shall be entrusted for any specific purpose, and every person acting as executor, administrator, conservator, guardian, receiver, assignee, custodian, or trustee appointed by order, decree or judgment of court, or by deed, will or other instrument in writing, who shall embezzle or fraudulently convert to his or her own use, or who shall take or secrete, with intent to embezzle or fraudulently convert to his or her own use, any money or other property which shall have come into his or her possession or shall be under his or her care or charge by virtue of his or her employment or for that specific purpose or by virtue of his or her acting as executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, receiver, assignee, custodian, or trustee, and every person who shall collect or receive money or property from another for a commission to be retained out of the money or other property so collected or received, and who shall fraudulently retain out of that money or property so collected or received more than the amount of the commission, and shall embezzle or fraudulently convert it to his or her own use, or shall take or secrete it with intent to embezzle or fraudulently to convert the same to his or her own use, shall be deemed guilty of larceny and shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or three (3) times the value of the money or property thus embezzled or converted, whichever is greater, or imprisoned not more than twenty (20) years, or both, except that if the sum or value of the property embezzled is less than one hundred dollars ($100), he or she shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 16; C.P.A. 1905, § 1175; P.L. 1908, ch. 1521, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 16; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-3

; P.L. 1991, ch. 138, § 1.

11-41-4.
Obtaining property by false pretenses or personation.

Every person who shall obtain from another designedly, by any false pretense or pretenses, any money, goods, wares, or other property, with intent to cheat or defraud, and every person who shall personate another or who shall falsely represent himself or herself to be the agent or servant of another and shall receive any money or other property intended to be delivered to the person so personated, or to the alleged principal or master of that agent or servant, shall be deemed guilty of larceny.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, §§ 14, 15; C.P.A. 1905, § 1174; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, §§ 14, 15; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-4

.

11-41-4.1.
Repealed.

11-41-5.
Penalties for larceny.

Any person convicted of any offense under §§

11-41-1

—

11-41-6

, except §

11-41-3

, shall be punished as follows, according to the value of the property or money stolen, received, embezzled, fraudulently appropriated, converted, or obtained, received, taken, or secreted by false pretenses or otherwise with intent to cheat, defraud, embezzle, or fraudulently convert:

If the value exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), and is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years or by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or both;

If the value exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) years or by a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both; and

If the value exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or if the property is a firearm as defined in §

11-47-5.1

, regardless of its value, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both. If the value does not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both. Any person convicted of an offense under §

11-41-2

who shall be found to have knowingly obtained the property from a person under eighteen (18) years of age, notwithstanding the value of the property or money, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Any person convicted of an offense in violation of §§

11-41-1

—

11-41-7

, except §

11-41-3

, that involves a victim who is a person sixty-five (65) years of age or older at the time of the offense and which involves property or money stolen, received, embezzled, fraudulently appropriated, converted, or obtained, received, taken, or secreted by false pretenses or otherwise with intent to cheat, defraud, embezzle, or fraudulently convert, with a value in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years but not more than fifteen (15) years or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both. If the value of the property or money does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year but not more than five (5) years or by a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.

In addition to any other penalties pursuant to this section, an elected official or candidate for office convicted of violating §

11-41-1

, §

11-41-2

, §

11-41-3

, or §

11-41-4

where the theft is a campaign account created, pursuant to title 17, for the benefit of the person so convicted, all restitution shall be deposited into the Rhode Island crime victim compensation program fund and not into the campaign account of that person convicted of the offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 11; G.L., ch. 279, § 16; C.P.A. 1905, § 1175; P.L. 1908, ch. 1521, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 16; G.L., ch. 345, § 18; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-5

; P.L. 1979, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 344, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 354, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 13, 2021.

11-41-6.
Attempted larceny.

Whoever attempts to commit larceny by doing any act toward the commission of the offense, but fails in its perpetration, shall, unless otherwise provided, suffer the same punishment which might have been inflicted if the attempted offense had been committed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 402, § 4; P.L. 1923, ch. 480, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-6

.

11-41-7.
Larceny from the person.

Every person who shall steal or attempt to steal from the person of another any money, goods, chattels, or other article enumerated in §

11-41-1

, shall be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-7

.

11-41-8.
Stealing of animals.

Every person who shall steal or attempt to steal any horse or other domestic animal shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both; in case a fine is imposed, one-half (1/2) shall inure to the use of the complainant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 68; P.L. 1908, ch. 1569, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 71; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 71; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 78; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-8

.

11-41-9.
Theft of poultry — Receiving stolen poultry.

Every person who steals poultry from any building or enclosure in which poultry are kept or confined, or whoever shall receive poultry, knowing it to have been stolen, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year or by fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both. One-half (1/2) of any fine imposed under this section shall inure to the complainant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 672, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 26; P.L. 1912, ch. 853, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-9

.

11-41-10.
Robbing of fish nets and weirs.

Every person who shall rob or draw any fishpot, weir, or net belonging to any other person shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-10

.

11-41-11.
Embezzlement by bank officer or employee.

Every officer, agent, or servant of any bank, savings bank, or trust company who shall embezzle or appropriate to his or her own use any moneys, goods, effects, or funds of any bank, savings bank or trust company with intent to cheat or defraud it or any person, shall be deemed guilty of larceny, and shall be fined not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or be imprisoned for a term not exceeding twenty (20) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 17; P.L. 1908, ch. 1590, § 81; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-11

.

11-41-11.1.
Unlawful appropriation.

Any person to whom any money or other property of another shall be entrusted or delivered for a particular purpose, who shall intentionally appropriate to his or her own use that money or property, shall be deemed guilty of unlawful appropriation and shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or three (3) times the value of the money or property thus appropriated, whichever is greater, or imprisoned not more than twenty (20) years, or both. However, if the sum or value of the property so appropriated is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), he or she shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 154, § 1.

11-41-12.
Fraudulent conversion by agent or factor.

Every agent or factor who shall deposit or pledge any goods, wares, or merchandise or any bill of lading, receipt, or certificate of a warehouse keeper or inspector, or any warrant or order for the delivery of goods with which he or she shall have been entrusted, or which shall have been consigned to him or her as a security for any money or other property borrowed or received by the agent or factor, and shall apply or dispose of the proceeds to his or her own use, in violation of good faith, and with intent to defraud any owner of the goods, shall be deemed and taken to be guilty of a felony and shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-12

; P.L. 2022, ch. 69, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 70, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.

11-41-13.
Obtaining signature by false pretenses.

Every person who, by any false pretense or pretenses, with intent to cheat or defraud, shall obtain the signature of any person to any written instrument, the false making of which would be punished as forgery, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 15; G.L., ch. 345, § 14, as enacted by P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-13

.

11-41-14.
Failure to return book or other library property.

Any person who shall take or borrow any book or other library property from any of the libraries or collections as defined in §

11-44-15(b)

, and who, upon neglect to return it within the time required and specified in the bylaws, rules, or regulations of the library owning the property, after receiving notice in writing by the librarian or other proper custodian of the property that it is overdue, shall upon further neglect to return it within sixty (60) days from the date of the notice be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), the fine to be for the use of the library. A written or printed notice given personally or sent by mail to a last known or registered place of residence shall be considered a sufficient notice. In addition, if the book should be lost, destroyed, or not returned, the person shall within sixty (60) days after being so notified pay to the custodian the replacement value of the book, including all reasonable processing costs, as determined by the governing board having jurisdiction.

All library users shall be notified of the penalties provided in subsection (a) of this section at the time they obtain or renew their library privileges. The final notice provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall also contain notice of the penalties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 53; P.L. 1907, ch. 1463, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 56; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 64; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-14

; P.L. 1983, ch. 296, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 436, § 1.

11-41-14.1.
Concealment of book or other property while on premises of library — Removal of book or other property from library.

Whoever, without authority, with the intention of converting to his or her own or another’s use, willfully conceals a book or other library property, while still on the premises of the library, or willfully or without authority removes any book or other library property from any of the libraries or collections set forth in §

11-44-15

, shall be deemed guilty of larceny, and upon, conviction, shall be punished as provided by §

11-41-5

and shall be ordered to make restitution to the library in the full retail value of the books or library property.

Any person reasonably believed to have committed or to be committing the crime set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to detention by a police officer in accordance with §

12-7-1

.

Any employee or agent of a library, eighteen (18) years of age or older, who observes any person willfully concealing or attempting to conceal books or other library property on his or her person or amongst his or her belongings or upon the person or amongst the belongings of another, and leaving the premises with the books or other library property without first having an employee or agent record the removal of the property, or injuring or destroying books and other library property as set forth in §

11-44-15

, may stop the person. Immediately upon stopping the person the library employee shall identify himself or herself and state the reason for stopping the person. If after the initial confrontation with the person under suspicion, the library employee has reasonable grounds to believe that at the time stopped the person was committing or attempting to commit the crime of larceny as set forth in this section or the misdemeanor set forth in §

11-44-15

, the employee or agent may detain the person for a time sufficient to summon a police officer to the library. In no case shall the detention be for a period of more than one-half (1/2) hour. The detention must be accomplished in a reasonable manner without unreasonable restraints or excessive force, and may take place only on the premises of the library where the alleged crime occurred. Library premises includes the interior of a building, structure, or other enclosure in which a library facility is located, the exterior appurtenances to any building, structure, or enclosure, and the land on which the building, structure, or other enclosure is located. Any person so stopped by an employee or agent of a library shall promptly identify himself or herself by name and address. Once placed under detention, no other information shall be required of the person and no written and/or signed statement shall be elicited from him or her until a police officer has taken him or her into custody. The employee or agent may however examine, for the purposes of ascertaining whether any book or other library property has been properly checked out by the person, the property which the employee has reasonable grounds to believe were unlawfully taken in violation of this chapter or injured or destroyed in violation of chapter 44 of title 11. Should the person detained refuse to surrender the item for examination, a limited and reasonable search may be conducted. Only packages, shopping bags, handbags, or other property in the immediate possession of the person detained, but not including any clothing worn by the person, may be searched.

For the purposes of this chapter, “reasonable grounds” includes knowledge that a person has concealed or injured a book or other library property while on the premises or is leaving the premises with the library property without having an employee of the library record the removal of the property from the premises.

In detaining a person whom the employee or agent of the library has reasonable grounds to believe is committing the crime of larceny set forth in this chapter or the misdemeanor set forth in chapter 44 of title 11, the employee or agent may use a reasonable amount of non-deadly force when and only when that force is necessary to protect himself or herself or to prevent the escape of the person being detained or the loss of his or her property.

In any civil action by a person detained under these sections against the library or employee or agent of the library so detaining him or her arising out of the detention, evidence that the defendant had reasonable grounds to believe that the plaintiff was at the time in question committing or attempting to commit the crime set forth in either section shall create a rebuttable presumption that the plaintiff was so committing or attempting to commit the crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 296, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 436, § 1.

11-41-15.
Recovered stolen property.

The officer who shall apprehend any person as principal or accessory in any robbery or larceny shall secure the property alleged to be stolen and shall be answerable for the property, and shall annex a schedule of it to his or her return. Upon receipt of the property from the apprehending officer, the clerk or person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property for a police department shall enter into a book a description of every article of property alleged to be stolen which was brought to the police department and shall attach a number to each article.

The clerk or person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property may deliver the property to the owner of the property upon satisfactory proof of ownership, provided that the following steps are followed:

A complete photographic record of the property is made;

The person from whom custody of the property was taken is served with a notice of the claim of ownership and is given a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to why the property should not be delivered to the person claiming ownership;

A signed declaration of ownership under penalty of perjury is obtained from the person to whom the property is delivered.

The delivery of property to the owner shall be without prejudice to the state or any other person who may have a claim to the property. Any property subject to forfeiture under any provision of law shall not be returned pursuant to this section.

Upon application to the superior court by the person from whom custody of the property was taken, a review of the determination of the clerk or the person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property shall be made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of that application. The court shall have the power to order the property taken into the custody of the court upon a finding that the person to whom the property was delivered was not entitled to it.

The clerk or person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property shall not be liable for damages for any official act performed in good faith in the course of carrying out the provisions of this section.

The photographic record of the alleged stolen property required by paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section shall be allowed to be introduced as evidence in any court of this state in place of the actual alleged stolen property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-15

; P.L. 1976, ch. 170, § 1.

11-41-16.
Sale or concealment of property leased or purchased on conditional sale.

Whoever, being in possession of personal property, other than wearing apparel, received upon a written and conditional contract of sale or acquired upon a written lease, or in which any person, firm, or corporation shall have a valid and perfected security interest in accordance with the provisions of title 6A, sells, conveys, conceals, or aids in concealing the property, or any part of it, or refuses to return the property with intent to defraud, before performance of the conditions precedent to acquiring its title, shall be guilty of larceny and be subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-41-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 58; P.L. 1926, ch. 828, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-16

; P.L. 1975, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 249, § 1.

11-41-16.1.
Sale or concealment of leased personal property.

Any person being in possession of personal property under a lease who sells, transfers, conceals, or aids in concealing the property, or any part of it, or refuses to return the leased personal property after the time of expiration of the lease with the intent of depriving the owner of the property, shall be guilty of larceny and be subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-41-5

.

The use of a false or fictitious name or address in obtaining leased personal property shall constitute prima facie evidence of intent to violate this section.

“Leased personal property”, as used in this section, means any personal property received pursuant to a written contract, by which one owning the property (lessor) grants to another (lessee) the right to possess, use, and enjoy the personal property for a specified period of time for a specified sum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 249, § 2.

11-41-17.
Unauthorized transfer of vehicle sold on conditional sale.

Every person who, with intent to place beyond the control of the vendor, any motor vehicle sold on condition that the title shall remain in the vendor after delivery, shall remove, conceal, or aid or abet the removal or concealment of the vehicle, and any vendee of a conditional sale who shall sell or convey the property without the consent of the vendor, and without informing the person to whom he or she sells or conveys that it is subject to the conditional sale, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 803, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 79; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-17

.

11-41-18.
Defacement or conversion of rental battery.

Any person, other than the owner or the owner’s duly authorized agent, who shall wrongfully or maliciously remove, deface, alter, or destroy, or cause to be removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, the word “rental” printed, painted, stamped upon or attached to any electric storage battery, or who shall wrongfully sell, give, or attempt to sell or give to any person any electric storage battery so marked, or who shall, without the written consent of the owner, retain in his or her possession any electric storage battery so marked, with intent to wrongfully keep or dispose of the battery by sale or gift, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 75; P.L. 1927, ch. 1041, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 82; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-18

.

11-41-19.
Refusal to return rental battery.

Every person having in his or her possession any electric storage battery, the property of another, who neglects or refuses for a period of fourteen (14) days after demand for it shall have been made to deliver it to its owner, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than twenty dollars ($20.00), and shall be liable to the owner in an action of the case for the value of the electric storage battery at the time it was delivered to the person. Demand for the return of an electric storage battery shall be made in writing and shall be served upon the person upon whom demand is made by leaving it in his or her hands and possession or by sending it to him or her, postage fully prepaid, by registered or certified mail, to the address given by him or her at the time he or she received the battery.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 76; P.L. 1932, ch. 1882, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 83; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-41-19

.

11-41-20.
Shoplifting.

For the purpose of this section:

“Conceal” means to place merchandise in such a manner that it is not visible through ordinary observation.

“Full retail value” means the merchant’s stated price of the merchandise.

“Merchandise” means any items of tangible personal property offered for sale within a retail mercantile establishment.

“Merchant” means an owner or operator of any retail mercantile establishment or any agent, employee, lessee, officer, or director of the owner or operator.

“Premises of a retail mercantile establishment” includes the retail mercantile establishment, and common use areas in shopping centers, and all parking areas set aside by a merchant or on behalf of a merchant for the parking of vehicles for the convenience of the patrons of the retail mercantile establishment.

“Retail mercantile establishment” means any place where merchandise is displayed, held, stored or offered for sale to the public.

“Shopping cart” means those push carts of the type or types which are commonly provided by grocery stores, drug stores, or other retail mercantile establishments for the use of the public in transporting commodities on or from the premises of the retail mercantile establishment.

Whoever shall engage in the following shall be guilty of the crime of shoplifting:

Take possession of, carry away, transfer or cause to be carried away or transferred any merchandise displayed, held, stored, or offered for sale by a retail mercantile establishment with the intention of depriving the merchant of all or any part of the full retail value of the merchandise;

Alter, transfer, or remove a label, price tag, marking, indicia of value or any other markings which aid in determining value affixed to any merchandise displayed, held, stored or offered for sale in a retail mercantile establishment and attempt to purchase or purchase the merchandise personally or in consort with another at less than the full retail value with the intention of depriving the merchant of all or any part of the full retail value of such merchandise;

Transfer any merchandise displayed, held, stored or offered for sale in a retail mercantile establishment from one container to another in an attempt to purchase or purchase the merchandise personally or in consort with another at less than the full retail value with the intention of depriving the merchant of all or any part of the full retail value of the merchandise; or

Remove a shopping cart from the premises of a retail mercantile establishment without the consent of the merchant given at the time of the removal with the intention of depriving the merchant of the possession, use, or benefit of the cart.

The fact that a person conceals upon his person, among his or her belongings, or upon the person or among the belongings of another merchandise displayed, held, stored or offered for sale in a retail mercantile establishment, for which he or she has not paid the full retail value, and the merchandise has been taken beyond the area within the retail mercantile establishment where payment for it is to be made, shall be prima facie evidence that the person has possessed, carried away, or transferred the merchandise with the intention of depriving the merchant of all or part of the full retail value of the merchandise without paying the full retail value of the merchandise.

Any person convicted of the crime of shoplifting shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) or two times the full retail value of the merchandise, whichever is greater, but not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both; provided, any person convicted of the crime of shoplifting merchandise with a retail value of over one hundred dollars ($100) who has previously been convicted of shoplifting shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2.

11-41-20.1.
Shoplifting — Use of implements in concealment.

Whoever shall willfully take possession of any goods, wares, or merchandise offered for sale by any store or other mercantile establishment, or whoever shall willfully conceal upon his or her person, among his belongings, or upon the person or among the belongings of another unpurchased goods, wares, or merchandise of any store or other mercantile establishment either inside the store or other mercantile establishment or outside, but in its immediate vicinity, with the intention of converting it to his or her own use without paying the purchase price, with intention of depriving the owner of all or some part of the value, while wearing any article of clothing, or carrying any implement of any kind specifically designed or adapted for the purpose of concealing, carrying away, or otherwise unlawfully removing any merchandise from a store, knowing the clothing or implement to be designed or adapted for that purpose, with the intent to use or employ it or allow it be used or employed for an unlawful purpose, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 214, § 1.

11-41-21.
Shoplifting — Enforcement.

Any person reasonably believed to have committed or to be committing the crime of shoplifting as defined in §

11-41-20

shall be subject to detention by a police officer in accordance with §

12-7-1

.

Any merchant who observes any person concealing or attempting to conceal merchandise on his person or amongst his or her belongings or upon the person or amongst the belongings of another, transporting merchandise beyond the area within the retail mercantile establishment where payment for it is to be made without making payment for it, removing or altering price tags on merchandise, or switching the containers of merchandise may stop the person. Immediately upon stopping the person, the merchant shall identify himself or herself and state his or her reason for stopping the person. If after his or her initial confrontation with the person under suspicion, the merchant has reasonable grounds to believe that at the time stopped the person was committing or attempting to commit the crime of shoplifting on the premises, the merchant may detain the person for a reasonable time sufficient to summon a police officer to the premises. In no case shall the detention be for a period exceeding one hour. Detention must be accomplished in a reasonable manner without unreasonable restraint or excessive force, and may take place only on the premises of the retail mercantile establishment where the alleged shoplifting occurred. Any person so stopped by a merchant pursuant to this section shall promptly identify himself or herself by name and address. Once placed under detention, no other information shall be required of the person and no written and/or signed statement, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, shall be elicited from the person until a police officer has taken him or her into custody. The merchant may, however, examine for the purposes of ascertaining ownership any merchandise which is in plain view which the merchant has reasonable grounds to believe was unlawfully taken or otherwise tampered with in violation of §

11-41-20

.

A merchant may request a person detained for shoplifting to sign a statement waiving his or her right to bring a civil action arising from the detention in return for a signed statement from the merchant waiving the right to bring criminal charges based upon the alleged shoplifting. Any statement shall state in writing in large print at the top of the form that the person detained has a right to remain silent and a right not to make or sign any statement and a right to call an attorney.

It shall be unlawful to circulate or cause to be circulated any signed statement or the name of any person signing the statement to a person or persons not employed by the retail mercantile establishment which obtained the statement, other than in defense of a legal action arising from the detention. Any person circulating or causing to be circulated this information shall be civilly liable to the person who signed the statement.

For the purposes of this section, “reasonable grounds” includes knowledge that a person has concealed unpurchased merchandise of the establishment while on the premises, or has altered or removed identifying labels on merchandise while on the premises, or is leaving the premises with unpurchased concealed or altered merchandise in his or her possession.

In detaining a person whom the merchant has reasonable grounds to believe is committing the crime of shoplifting, the merchant may use a reasonable amount of non-deadly force when and only when that force is necessary to protect himself or herself, or to prevent the escape of the person being detained or the loss of his or her property.

In any civil action by a person detained under this section against the merchant so detaining him or her arising out of the detention, evidence that the defendant had reasonable grounds as defined in subsection (d) of this section to believe that the plaintiff was at the time in question committing or attempting to commit the crime of shoplifting as defined in §

11-41-20

shall create a rebuttable presumption that the plaintiff was so committing or attempting to commit the crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 208, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 105, § 1.

11-41-22.
Severability of shoplifting provisions.

If any section, clause, sentence, paragraph or part of §§

11-41-20

—

11-41-22

shall for any reason be adjudged invalid, the remainder of §§

11-41-20

—

11-41-22

shall not be affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 133, § 2.

11-41-23.
Larceny of marine equipment.

Every person who shall steal or attempt to steal any boat, marine motor, marine electronic equipment, marine rescue or safety equipment, or navigational equipment, or who shall fraudulently receive any boat, marine motor, marine electronic equipment, marine safety or navigation equipment, or marine equipment with serial numbers removed, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 209, § 1.

11-41-24.
Habitual offender.

Any person who shall be convicted three (3) times for the crime of shoplifting as defined in §

11-41-2

0 or larceny as defined in §

11-41-1

or receiving stolen goods as defined in §

11-41-2

, or who shall have been convicted three (3) times of any combination of the crimes described in this section, shall also be charged as an habitual offender and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be imprisoned not less than six (6) months nor more than one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 142, § 1.

11-41-25.
Siphoning of gasoline.

Every person who shall siphon or otherwise steal gasoline from a motor vehicle shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for the first offense, and thereafter by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 145, § 1.